Illinois, session 104th, SB3984.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Election Code is amended by changing 5Section 9-8.10 as follows: 6    (10 ILCS 5/9-8.10)7    Sec. 9-8.10. Use of political committee and other 8reporting organization funds. 9    (a) A political committee shall not make expenditures: 10        (1) In violation of any law of the United States or of 11    this State. 12        (2) Clearly in excess of the fair market value of the 13    services, materials, facilities, or other things of value 14    received in exchange. 15        (3) For satisfaction or repayment of any debts other 16    than loans made to the committee or to the public official 17    or candidate on behalf of the committee or repayment of 18    goods and services purchased by the committee under a 19    credit agreement. Nothing in this Section authorizes the 20    use of campaign funds to repay personal loans. The 21    repayments shall be made by check written to the person 22    who made the loan or credit agreement. The terms and 23    conditions of any loan or credit agreement to a committee   SB3984- 2 -LRB104 19635 SPS 33084 b1    shall be set forth in a written agreement, including but 2    not limited to the method and amount of repayment, that 3    shall be executed by the chair or treasurer of the 4    committee at the time of the loan or credit agreement. The 5    loan or agreement shall also set forth the rate of 6    interest for the loan, if any, which may not substantially 7    exceed the prevailing market interest rate at the time the 8    agreement is executed. 9        (4) For the satisfaction or repayment of any debts or 10    for the payment of any expenses relating to a personal 11    residence. Campaign funds may not be used as collateral 12    for home mortgages. The provisions of this paragraph do 13    not apply to expenditures by a political committee for 14    expenses related to: (i) a public official's or 15    candidate's personal security services or security 16    enhancements to a public official's or candidate's primary 17    residence, including, but not limited to, security 18    systems, cameras, walls, fences, or other physical 19    structures, if the security services or security 20    enhancements are reasonably necessary due to risks arising 21    from the public official's or candidate's political or 22    governmental duties; or (ii) cybersecurity measures or 23    tools used to protect and secure a public official's or 24    candidate's personal, political, and government devices, 25    Internet networks, or other technology, if the 26    cybersecurity measures or tools are reasonably necessary   SB3984- 3 -LRB104 19635 SPS 33084 b1    due to risks arising from the public official's or 2    candidate's political or governmental duties.3        (5) For clothing or personal laundry expenses, except 4    clothing items rented by the public official or candidate 5    for his or her own use exclusively for a specific 6    campaign-related event, provided that committees may 7    purchase costumes, novelty items, or other accessories 8    worn primarily to advertise the candidacy. 9        (6) For the travel expenses of any person unless the 10    travel is necessary for fulfillment of political, 11    governmental, or public policy duties, activities, or 12    purposes. 13        (7) For membership or club dues charged by 14    organizations, clubs, or facilities that are primarily 15    engaged in providing health, exercise, or recreational 16    services; provided, however, that funds received under 17    this Article may be used to rent the clubs or facilities 18    for a specific campaign-related event. 19        (8) In payment for anything of value or for 20    reimbursement of any expenditure for which any person has 21    been reimbursed by the State or any person. For purposes 22    of this item (8), a per diem allowance is not a 23    reimbursement. 24        (9) For the lease or purchase of or installment 25    payment for a motor vehicle unless the political committee 26    can demonstrate the vehicle will be used primarily for   SB3984- 4 -LRB104 19635 SPS 33084 b1    campaign purposes or for the performance of governmental 2    duties. Nothing in this paragraph prohibits a political 3    committee from using political funds to make expenditures 4    related to vehicles not purchased or leased by a political 5    committee, provided the expenditure relates to the use of 6    the vehicle for primarily campaign purposes or the 7    performance of governmental duties. Persons using vehicles 8    not purchased or leased by a political committee may be 9    reimbursed for actual mileage for the use of the vehicle 10    for campaign purposes or for the performance of 11    governmental duties. The mileage reimbursements shall be 12    made at a rate not to exceed the standard mileage rate 13    method for computation of business expenses under the 14    Internal Revenue Code. 15        (10) Directly for an individual's tuition or other 16    educational expenses, except for governmental or political 17    purposes directly related to a candidate's or public 18    official's duties and responsibilities. 19        (11) For payments to a public official or candidate or 20    his or her family member unless for compensation for 21    services actually rendered by that person. The provisions 22    of this item (11) do not apply to expenditures by a 23    political committee for expenses related to providing 24    childcare for a minor child or care for a dependent family 25    member if the care is reasonably necessary for the public 26    official or candidate to fulfill political or governmental   SB3984- 5 -LRB104 19635 SPS 33084 b1    duties. The provisions of this item (11) do not apply to 2    expenditures by a political committee in an aggregate 3    amount not exceeding the amount of funds reported to and 4    certified by the State Board or county clerk as available 5    as of June 30, 1998, in the semi-annual report of 6    contributions and expenditures filed by the political 7    committee for the period concluding June 30, 1998. As used 8    in this paragraph, "immediate family member" means (i) 9    anyone living with a public official or candidate or (ii) 10    a spouse, child, sibling, or parent of a public official 11    or candidate, regardless of whether that person lives with 12    the public official or candidate; and "payments" means any 13    compensation for which the paying party would be required 14    to file a Form W-2 or Form 1099. 15    (b) The Board shall have the authority to investigate, 16upon receipt of a verified complaint, violations of the 17provisions of this Section. The Board may levy a fine on any 18person who knowingly makes expenditures in violation of this 19Section and on any person who knowingly makes a malicious and 20false accusation of a violation of this Section. The Board may 21act under this subsection only upon the affirmative vote of at 22least 5 of its members. The fine shall not exceed $500 for each 23expenditure of $500 or less and shall not exceed the amount of 24the expenditure plus $500 for each expenditure greater than 25$500. The Board shall also have the authority to render 26rulings and issue opinions relating to compliance with this   SB3984- 6 -LRB104 19635 SPS 33084 b1Section. 2    (c) Nothing in this Section prohibits the expenditure of 3funds of a political committee controlled by an officeholder 4or by a candidate to defray the customary and reasonable 5expenses of an officeholder in connection with the performance 6of governmental and public service functions. 7    (d) Nothing in this Section prohibits the funds of a 8political committee which is controlled by a person convicted 9of a violation of any of the offenses listed in subsection (a) 10of Section 10 of the Public Corruption Profit Forfeiture Act 11from being forfeited to the State under Section 15 of the 12Public Corruption Profit Forfeiture Act. 13(Source: P.A. 104-443, eff. 1-1-26.) 14    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 15becoming law.